Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1367.1-A of Title 68, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For the purpose of compensating the seller or vendor in
keeping sales tax records, filing reports and remitting the tax when
due, a seller or vendor shall be allowed a deduction of one percent
(1%) of the tax due under the applicable provisions of Title 68 of
the Oklahoma Statutes.
Such deduction shall not be allowed with respect to a direct
payment permit.

Req. No. 10186 Page 1

B. No deductions from tax shall be allowed if any such report
or payment of tax is delinquent.
C. Notwithstanding the formula provided by subsection A of this
section, the deduction provided by this section shall be limited to
a maximum of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) per month
per sales tax permit. No such sales tax permit holder may change
sales tax permit status in order to avoid the provisions of this
subsection.
D. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an amount equal
to the excess of the amount calculated by the formula provided by
subsection A of this section over the two-thousand-five-hundred-
dollar limit provided by subsection C of this section shall be
retained by the state as an administrative expense and deposited to
the General Revenue Fund.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1410.1-A of Title 68, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
For the purpose of compensating the seller or vendor in keeping
use tax records, filing reports and remitting the tax when due, a
seller or vendor shall be allowed a deduction equal to the amount
provided for vendors under the Oklahoma Sales Tax Code.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
Req. No. 10186 Page 2

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10186 MAH 01/14/25




















Req. No. 10186 Page 3